North Carolina statutes. Chapter 89C. Engineering and Land Surveying.
§ 89C-15.
Examinations.

The examinations will be held at the times and places as the Board directs. The Board shall determine the passing grade on examinations. All examinations shall be approved by the entire Board.

Examinations will be given as follows:

Fundamentals of Engineering. — Consists of an examination on the fundamentals of engineering. Passing this examination qualifies the applicant for an engineer intern certificate, provided the applicant has met all other requirements for licensure required by this Chapter.

Principles and Practice of Engineering. — Consists of an examination on applied engineering. Passing this examination qualifies the applicant for licensure as a professional engineer, provided the applicant has met the other requirements for licensure required by this Chapter.

Fundamentals of Land Surveying. — Consists of an examination on the fundamentals of land surveying. Passing this examination qualifies the applicant for a land surveyor intern certificate provided the applicant has met all other requirements for certification required by this Chapter.

Principles and Practice of Land Surveying. — Consists of an examination on the applied disciplines of land surveying and an examination on requirements specific to the practice of land surveying in North Carolina. Passing each of these examinations qualifies the applicant for a professional land surveyor certificate provided the applicant has met all other requirements for certification required by this Chapter.

History.

1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 13; 2013-98, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-98, s. 3, effective June 12, 2013, rewrote subsection (b), which formerly read “Written examinations will be given in sections and may be taken only after the applicant has met the other minimum requirements as given in

G.S. 89C-13

and has been approved by the Board for admission to the examination as follows”; rewrote the subdivision headings; deleted “eight-hour” preceding “examination” in subdivisions (b)(1) through (b)(3); substituted “engineer” for “engineering” in subdivision (b)(1); substituted “licensure” for “registration” in the second sentence in subdivision (b)(2); substituted “fundamentals” for “elementary disciplines” in subdivision (b)(3); and in subdivision (b)(4), substituted “an examination” for “a six-hour examination” and “a two-hour examination,” and deleted “basic and” preceding “applied disciplines.”

§ 89C-16.
Certificates of licensure; effect; seals.

The Board shall issue to any applicant, who, in the opinion of the Board, has met the requirements of this Chapter, a certificate of licensure giving the licensee proper authority to practice the profession in this State. The certificate of licensure for a professional engineer shall carry the designation “professional engineer,” and for a land surveyor, “professional land surveyor,” shall give the full name of the licensee with the Board designated licensure number and shall be signed by the chair and the secretary under the seal of the Board.

This certificate shall be prima facie evidence that the person named on the certificate is entitled to all rights, privileges and responsibilities of a professional engineer or a professional land surveyor, while the certificate of licensure remains unrevoked or unexpired.

Each licensee shall upon licensure obtain a seal of a design authorized by the Board bearing the licensee’s name, license number, and the legend, “professional engineer,” or “professional land surveyor.” Final drawings, specifications, plans and reports prepared by a licensee shall, when issued, be certified and stamped with the seal or facsimile of the seal unless the licensee is exempt under the provisions of G.S. 89C-25(7). It shall be unlawful for a licensee to affix, or permit the licensee’s seal and signature or facsimile of the seal and signature to be affixed to any drawings, specifications, plans or reports after the expiration of a certificate or for the purpose of aiding or abetting any other person to evade or attempt to evade any provision of this Chapter. A professional engineer practicing land surveying shall use the licensee’s land surveyor seal.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 11; C.S., s. 6055(m); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1957, c. 1060, s. 6; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 14.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

For a registrant to be able to legally seal and sign plans prepared by others, it is necessary that the documents be prepared under his direct supervision, meaning a person employed by and under control of the registrant. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. B.A. Saholsky, 41 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 423 (1971).

§ 89C-17.
Expirations and renewals of certificates. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

Certificates for licensure of corporations and business firms that engage in the practice of engineering or land surveying shall expire on the last day of the month of June following their issuance or renewal and shall become invalid on that date unless renewed. All other certificates for licensure shall expire on the last day of the month of December next following their issuance or renewal, and shall become invalid on that date unless renewed. When necessary to protect the public health, safety, or welfare, the Board shall require any evidence necessary to establish the continuing competency of engineers and land surveyors as a condition of renewal of licenses. When the Board is satisfied as to the continuing competency of an applicant, it shall issue a renewal of the certificate upon payment by the applicant of a fee fixed by the Board but not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00). The secretary of the Board shall notify by mail every person licensed under this Chapter of the date of expiration of the certificate, the amount of the fee required for its renewal for one year, and any requirement as to evidence of continued competency. The notice shall be mailed at least one month in advance of the expiration date of the certificate. Renewal shall be effected at any time during the month immediately following the month of expiration, by payment to the secretary of the Board of a renewal fee, as determined by the Board, which shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00). Failure on the part of any licensee to renew the certificate annually in the month immediately following the month of expiration, as required above, shall deprive the licensee of the right to practice until reinstatement of the license. The license may be reinstated at anytime during the first 12 months immediately following the date the license became invalid by payment of a reinstatement fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) in addition to the established renewal fee. Failure of a licensee to reinstate the license during the first 12 months immediately following the date the license became invalid shall require the individual, prior to resuming practice in North Carolina, to submit an application on the prescribed form, and to meet all other requirements for licensure as set forth in Chapter 89C. The secretary of the Board is instructed to remove from the official roster of engineers and land surveyors the names of all licensees who have not effected their renewal by the first day of the month immediately following the renewal period. The Board may adopt rules to provide for renewals in distress or hardship cases due to military service, prolonged illness, or prolonged absence from the State, where the applicant for renewal demonstrates to the Board that the applicant has maintained active knowledge and professional status as an engineer or land surveyor, as the case may be. It shall be the responsibility of each licensee to inform the Board promptly concerning change in address. A licensee may request and be granted inactive status. No inactive licensee may practice in this State unless otherwise exempted in this Chapter. A licensee granted inactive status shall pay annual renewal fees but shall not be subject to annual continuing professional competency requirements. A licensee granted inactive status may return to active status by meeting all requirements of the Board, including demonstration of continuing professional competency as a condition of reinstatement.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 9; C.S., s. 6055(k); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1953, c. 1041, s. 9; 1957, c. 1060, s. 4; 1973, c. 1321; c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1979, c. 819, ss. 3, 4; 1985, c. 373; 1998-118, s. 15; 2000-115, s. 2; 2003-347, s. 3.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(g), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(e), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to applications for licensure on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2022-1, s. 1(e), inserted “or email” following “notify by mail” near the beginning of the fifth sentence; and inserted “sent by mail or” following “notice shall be” near the beginning of the sixth sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 89C-17.
Expirations and renewals of certificates. [Effective July 1, 2022]

Certificates for licensure of corporations and business firms that engage in the practice of engineering or land surveying shall expire on the last day of the month of June following their issuance or renewal and shall become invalid on that date unless renewed. All other certificates for licensure shall expire on the last day of the month of December next following their issuance or renewal, and shall become invalid on that date unless renewed. When necessary to protect the public health, safety, or welfare, the Board shall require any evidence necessary to establish the continuing competency of engineers and land surveyors as a condition of renewal of licenses. When the Board is satisfied as to the continuing competency of an applicant, it shall issue a renewal of the certificate upon payment by the applicant of a fee fixed by the Board but not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00). The secretary of the Board shall notify by mail or email every person licensed under this Chapter of the date of expiration of the certificate, the amount of the fee required for its renewal for one year, and any requirement as to evidence of continued competency. The notice shall be sent by email or mailed at least one month in advance of the expiration date of the certificate. Renewal shall be effected at any time during the month immediately following the month of expiration, by payment to the secretary of the Board of a renewal fee, as determined by the Board, which shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00). Failure on the part of any licensee to renew the certificate annually in the month immediately following the month of expiration, as required above, shall deprive the licensee of the right to practice until reinstatement of the license. The license may be reinstated at anytime during the first 12 months immediately following the date the license became invalid by payment of a reinstatement fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) in addition to the established renewal fee. Failure of a licensee to reinstate the license during the first 12 months immediately following the date the license became invalid shall require the individual, prior to resuming practice in North Carolina, to submit an application on the prescribed form, and to meet all other requirements for licensure as set forth in Chapter 89C. The secretary of the Board is instructed to remove from the official roster of engineers and land surveyors the names of all licensees who have not effected their renewal by the first day of the month immediately following the renewal period. The Board may adopt rules to provide for renewals in distress or hardship cases due to military service, prolonged illness, or prolonged absence from the State, where the applicant for renewal demonstrates to the Board that the applicant has maintained active knowledge and professional status as an engineer or land surveyor, as the case may be. It shall be the responsibility of each licensee to inform the Board promptly concerning change in address. A licensee may request and be granted inactive status. No inactive licensee may practice in this State unless otherwise exempted in this Chapter. A licensee granted inactive status shall pay annual renewal fees but shall not be subject to annual continuing professional competency requirements. A licensee granted inactive status may return to active status by meeting all requirements of the Board, including demonstration of continuing professional competency as a condition of reinstatement.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 9; C.S., s. 6055(k); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1953, c. 1041, s. 9; 1957, c. 1060, s. 4; 1973, c. 1321; c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1979, c. 819, ss. 3, 4; 1985, c. 373; 1998-118, s. 15; 2000-115, s. 2; 2003-347, s. 3; 2022-1, s. 1(e).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(g), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(e), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to applications for licensure on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2022-1, s. 1(e), inserted “or email” following “notify by mail” near the beginning of the fifth sentence; and inserted “sent by mail or” following “notice shall be” near the beginning of the sixth sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 89C-18.
Duplicate certificates.

The Board may issue a duplicate certificate of licensure or certificate of authorization to replace any certificate that has been lost, destroyed, or mutilated and may charge a fee of up to twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for issuing the certificate.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 10; C.S., s. 6055(l); 1939, c. 218, s. 2; 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1953, c. 1041, s. 10; 1957, c. 1060, s. 5; 1973, c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 671, s. 3; 1998-118, s. 16.

§ 89C-18.1.
Licensing of nonresidents.

Definitions. — The following definitions apply in this section:

Delinquent income tax debt. — The amount of income tax due as stated in a final notice of assessment issued to a taxpayer by the Secretary of Revenue when the taxpayer no longer has the right to contest the amount.

Foreign corporation. — Defined in

G.S. 55-1-40

.

Foreign entity. — A foreign corporation, a foreign limited liability company, or a foreign partnership.

Foreign limited liability company. — Has the same meaning as the term “foreign LLC” in

G.S. 57D-1-03

.

Foreign partnership. — Either of the following that does not have a permanent place of business in this State:

A foreign limited partnership as defined in

G.S. 59-102

.

A general partnership formed under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this State.

Licensing. — The Board shall not renew a certificate of licensure for a foreign corporation unless the corporation has obtained a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State pursuant to Article 15 of Chapter 55 of the General Statutes. The Board shall not renew a certificate of licensure for a foreign limited liability company unless the company has obtained a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 57D of the General Statutes.

Information. — Upon request, the Board shall provide the Secretary of Revenue on an annual basis the name, address, and tax identification number of every nonresident individual and foreign entity licensed by the Board. The information shall be provided in the format required by the Secretary of Revenue.

Delinquents. — If the Secretary of Revenue determines that any nonresident individual or foreign corporation licensed by the Board, a member of any foreign limited liability company licensed by the Board, or a partner in any foreign partnership licensed by the Board, owes a delinquent income tax debt, the Secretary of Revenue may notify the Board of these nonresident individuals and foreign entities and instruct the Board not to renew their certificates of licensure. The Board shall not renew the certificate of licensure of such a nonresident individual or foreign entity identified by the Secretary of Revenue unless the Board receives a written statement from the Secretary that the debt either has been paid or is being paid pursuant to an installment agreement.

History.

1998-162, ss. 7, 13; 2013-157, s. 23.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-157, s. 23, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “Has the same meaning as the term ‘foreign LLC’ in

G.S. 57D-1-03

” for “Defined in G.S. 57C-1-03” in subdivision (a)(4); and substituted “57D” for “57C” in subsection (b).

§ 89C-19.
Public works; requirements where public safety involved.

This State and its political subdivisions such as counties, cities, towns, or other political entities or legally constituted boards, commissions, public utility companies, or authorities, or officials, or employees of these entities shall not engage in the practice of engineering or land surveying involving either public or private property where the safety of the public is directly involved without the project being under the responsible charge of a professional engineer for engineering projects, or a professional land surveyor for land surveying projects, as provided for the practice of the respective professions by this Chapter.

An official or employee of the State or any political subdivision specified in this section, holding the positions set out in this section as of June 19, 1975, shall be exempt from the provisions of this section so long as such official or employee is engaged in substantially the same type of work as is involved in the present position.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit inspection, maintenance and service work done by employees of the State of North Carolina, any political subdivision of the State, or any municipality including construction, installation, servicing, and maintenance by regular full-time employees of, secondary roads and drawings incidental to work on secondary roads, streets, street lighting, traffic-control signals, police and fire alarm systems, waterworks, steam, electric and sewage treatment and disposal plants, the services of superintendents, inspectors or foremen regularly employed by the State of North Carolina or any political subdivision of the State, or municipal corporation.

The provisions in this section shall not be construed to alter or modify the requirements of Article 1 of Chapter 133 of the General Statutes.

History.

1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 17; 2014-120, s. 11(b); 2015-264, s. 47.5(a).

§ 89C-19.1.
Engineer or professional land surveyor who volunteers during an emergency or disaster; qualified immunity.

A licensed professional or any other individual working under the direct supervision of a licensed professional who voluntarily, without compensation, provides structural, electrical, mechanical, other engineering services or land surveying services at the scene of a declared disaster or emergency, declared under federal law or in accordance with the provisions of Article 1A of Chapter 166A of the General Statutes, at the request of a public official, law enforcement official, public safety official, or building inspection official, acting in an official capacity, shall not be liable for any personal injury, wrongful death, property damage, or other loss caused by the licensed professional’s acts or omissions in the performance of the services.

The immunity provided in subsection (a) of this section for professional engineers applies only to an engineering service:

For any structure, building, piping, or other engineered system, either publicly or privately owned.

That occurs within 45 days after the declaration of the emergency or disaster, unless the 45-day immunity period is extended by an executive order issued by the Governor under the Governor’s emergency executive powers.

(b1)

The immunity provided in subsection (a) of this section for professional land surveyors applies only to land surveying services that occur within 45 days after the declaration of the emergency or disaster, unless the 45-day immunity period is extended by an executive order issued by the Governor under the Governor’s emergency executive powers.

The immunity provided in subsection (a) of this section does not apply if it is determined that the personal injury, wrongful death, property damage, or other loss was caused by the gross negligence, wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing of the licensed professional, or arose out of the operation of a motor vehicle.

As used in this section:

“Building inspection official” means any appointed or elected federal, State, or local official with overall executive responsibility to coordinate building inspection in the jurisdiction in which the emergency or disaster is declared.

“Law enforcement official” means any appointed or elected federal, State, or local official with overall executive responsibility to coordinate law enforcement in the jurisdiction in which the emergency or disaster is declared.

(2a)

“Licensed professional” means any professional engineer or professional land surveyor.

“Public official” means any federal, State, or locally elected official with overall executive responsibility in the jurisdiction in which the emergency or disaster is declared.

“Public safety official” means any appointed or elected federal, State, or local official with overall executive responsibility to coordinate public safety in the jurisdiction in which the emergency or disaster is declared.

History.

1995, c. 416, s. 1; 2012-12, s. 2(q); 2018-5, s. 5.6(l).

§ 89C-20.
Rules of professional conduct.

In the interest of protecting the safety, health, and welfare of the public, the Board shall adopt rules of professional conduct applicable to the practice of engineering and land surveying. These rules, when adopted, shall be construed to be a reasonable exercise of the police power vested in the Board of Examiners for Engineers and Land Surveyors. Every person licensed by the Board shall subscribe to and observe the adopted rules as the standard of professional conduct for the practice of engineering and land surveying and shall cooperate fully with the Board in the course of any investigation. In the case of violation of the rules of professional conduct, the Board shall proceed in accordance with

G.S. 89C-22

.

History.

1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 73; 1998-118, s. 18.

§ 89C-21.
Disciplinary action — Reexamination, revocation, suspension, reprimand, or civil penalty.

The Board may reprimand the licensee, suspend, refuse to renew, refuse to reinstate, or revoke the certificate of licensure, require additional education or, as appropriate, require reexamination, for any engineer or land surveyor, who is found guilty of any of the following:

Fraud or deceit in obtaining or renewing a certificate of licensure or certificate of authorization.

Gross negligence, incompetence, or misconduct in the practice of the profession.

Conviction of, or entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, any crime that is a felony, whether or not related to the practice of engineering or surveying; conviction of, or entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, any crime, whether a felony, misdemeanor, or otherwise, where an essential element of the crime is dishonesty or when the crime is directly related to the practice of engineering or surveying; or conviction of, or entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, of any crime involving moral turpitude.

Violation of any provisions of this Chapter, the Rules of Professional Conduct, or any rules as adopted by the Board.

Being declared insane or incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction and having not later been lawfully declared sane or competent.

Professional incompetence. In the event the Board finds that a certificate holder is incompetent the Board may, in its discretion, require oral or written examinations, or other indication of the certificate holder’s fitness to practice engineering or land surveying and suspend the license during any such period.

The Board may (i) revoke a certificate of authorization, or (ii) to suspend a certificate of authorization for a period of time not exceeding two years, of any corporation or business firm where one or more of its officers or directors have committed any act or have been guilty of any conduct which would authorize a revocation or suspension of their certificates of licensure under the provision of this section.

The Board may levy a civil penalty not in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for any engineer or not in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) for any land surveyor who violates any of the provisions of subdivisions (1) through (4) of subsection (a) of this section. The clear proceeds of all civil penalties collected by the Board, including civil penalties collected pursuant to G.S. 89C-22(c), shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Before imposing and assessing a civil penalty and fixing the amount, the Board shall, as a part of its deliberation, take into consideration the following factors:

The nature, gravity, and persistence of the particular violations;

The appropriateness of the imposition of a civil penalty when considered alone or in combination with other punishment;

Whether the violation(s) were done willfully and maliciously; and

Any other factors which would tend to either mitigate or aggravate the violation(s) found to exist.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 10; C.S., s. 6055(l); 1939, c. 218, s. 2; 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1953, c. 1041, s. 10; 1957, c. 1060, s. 5; 1973, c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1989, c. 669, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 671, s. 6; 1998-118, s. 19; 1998-215, s. 134; 2003-347, s. 2; 2011-304, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-304, s. 5, effective June 26, 2011, rewrote subsection (a).

§ 89C-22.
Disciplinary action — Charges; procedure. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

Any person may prefer charges of fraud, deceit, gross negligence, incompetence, misconduct, or violations of this Chapter, the rules of professional conduct, or any rules adopted by the Board against any Board licensee. The charges shall be in writing and shall be sworn to by the person or persons making them and shall be filed with the Board.

All charges, unless dismissed by the Board as unfounded or trivial or unless settled informally, shall be heard by the Board as provided under the requirements of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

If, after a hearing, a majority of the Board votes in favor of sustaining the charges, the Board shall reprimand, levy a civil penalty, suspend, refuse to renew, refuse to reinstate, or revoke the licensee’s certificate, require additional education or, as appropriate, require reexamination.

A licensee who is aggrieved by a final decision of the Board may appeal for judicial review as provided by Article 4 of Chapter 150B.

The Board may, upon petition of an individual or an entity whose certificate has been revoked, for sufficient reasons as it may determine, reissue a certificate of licensure or authorization, provided that a majority of the members of the Board vote in favor of such issuance.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 10; C.S., s. 6055(l); 1939, c. 218, s. 2; 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1953, c. 1041, s. 10; 1957, c. 1060, s. 5; 1973, c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1981, c. 789; 1989, c. 669, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 671, s. 7; 1998-118, s. 20; 2011-304, s. 6.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(g), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(f), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to applications for licensure on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-304, s. 6, effective June 26, 2011, in the first sentence of subsection (a), substituted “or violations of this Chapter, the rules of professional conduct, or any rules adopted by the Board against any Board licensee” for “or violation of the rules of professional conduct against any Board registrant”; in subsection (b), inserted “or unless settled informally”; in subsection (c), inserted “refuse to reinstate” and added “require additional education or, as appropriate, require reexamination.”

Session Laws 2022-1, s. 1(f), substituted “or submitted electronically” for “and shall be sworn to by the person or persons making them” near the middle of the second sentence of subsection (a). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 89C-22.
Disciplinary action — Charges; procedure. [Effective July 1, 2022]

Any person may prefer charges of fraud, deceit, gross negligence, incompetence, misconduct, or violations of this Chapter, the rules of professional conduct, or any rules adopted by the Board against any Board licensee. The charges shall be in writing or submitted electronically and shall be filed with the Board.

All charges, unless dismissed by the Board as unfounded or trivial or unless settled informally, shall be heard by the Board as provided under the requirements of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

If, after a hearing, a majority of the Board votes in favor of sustaining the charges, the Board shall reprimand, levy a civil penalty, suspend, refuse to renew, refuse to reinstate, or revoke the licensee’s certificate, require additional education or, as appropriate, require reexamination.

A licensee who is aggrieved by a final decision of the Board may appeal for judicial review as provided by Article 4 of Chapter 150B.

The Board may, upon petition of an individual or an entity whose certificate has been revoked, for sufficient reasons as it may determine, reissue a certificate of licensure or authorization, provided that a majority of the members of the Board vote in favor of such issuance.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 10; C.S., s. 6055(l); 1939, c. 218, s. 2; 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1953, c. 1041, s. 10; 1957, c. 1060, s. 5; 1973, c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1981, c. 789; 1989, c. 669, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 671, s. 7; 1998-118, s. 20; 2011-304, s. 6; 2022-1, s. 1(f).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(g), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(f), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to applications for licensure on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-304, s. 6, effective June 26, 2011, in the first sentence of subsection (a), substituted “or violations of this Chapter, the rules of professional conduct, or any rules adopted by the Board against any Board licensee” for “or violation of the rules of professional conduct against any Board registrant”; in subsection (b), inserted “or unless settled informally”; in subsection (c), inserted “refuse to reinstate” and added “require additional education or, as appropriate, require reexamination.”

Session Laws 2022-1, s. 1(f), substituted “or submitted electronically” for “and shall be sworn to by the person or persons making them” near the middle of the second sentence of subsection (a). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 89C-23.
Unlawful to practice engineering or land surveying without licensure; unlawful use of title or terms; penalties; Attorney General to be legal adviser.

Any person who shall practice, or offer to practice, engineering or land surveying in this State without first being licensed in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter, or any person, firm, partnership, organization, association, corporation, or other entity using or employing the words “engineer” or “engineering” or “professional engineer” or “professional engineering” or “land surveyor” or “land surveying,” or any modification or derivative of those words in its name or form of business or activity except as licensed under this Chapter or in pursuit of activities exempted by this Chapter, or any person presenting or attempting to use the certificate of licensure or the seal of another, or any person who shall give any false or forged evidence of any kind to the Board or to any member of the Board in obtaining or attempting to obtain a certificate of licensure, or any person who shall falsely impersonate any other licensee of like or different name, or any person who shall attempt to use an expired or revoked or nonexistent certificate of licensure, or who shall practice or offer to practice when not qualified, or any person who falsely claims that the person is registered under this Chapter, or any person who shall violate any of the provisions of this Chapter, in addition to injunctive procedures set out hereinbefore, shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. In no event shall there be representation of or holding out to the public of any engineering expertise by unlicensed persons. It shall be the duty of all duly constituted officers of the State and all political subdivisions of the State to enforce the provisions of this Chapter and to prosecute any persons violating them.

The Attorney General of the State or an assistant shall act as legal adviser to the Board and render any legal assistance necessary to carry out the provisions of this Chapter. The Board may employ counsel and necessary assistance to aid in the enforcement of this Chapter, and the compensation and expenses for the assistance shall be paid from funds of the Board.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 12; C.S., s. 6055(n); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 612; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1998-118, s. 21.

§ 89C-24.
Licensure of corporations and business firms that engage in the practice of engineering or land surveying.

A corporation or business firm may not engage in the practice of engineering or land surveying in this State unless it is licensed by the Board and has paid an application fee established by the Board in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00). A corporation or business firm is subject to the same duties and responsibilities as an individual licensee. Licensure of a corporation or business firm does not affect the requirement that all engineering or land surveying work done by the corporation or business firm be performed by or under the responsible charge of individual registrants, nor does it relieve the individual registrants within a corporation or business firm of their design and supervision responsibilities. The Board may adopt rules regulating the operation of offices and places of business of corporations and business firms licensed under this section to ensure that professional engineering and land surveying services are performed under the supervision of licensed professional engineers and land surveyors.

This section applies to every corporation that is engaged in the practice of engineering or land surveying, regardless of when it was incorporated. A corporation that is not exempt from Chapter 55B of the General Statutes by application of

G.S. 55B-15

must be incorporated under that Chapter.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 14; C.S., s. 6055(p); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1969, c. 718, s. 18; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 671, s. 4; 1998-118, s. 22; 2000-115, s. 3.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The registration requirement contained in this section applies to any corporation, including a non-profit corporation, if the corporation is engaged in the practice of engineering as defined by the statute. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Jerry T. Carter, Executive Director, North Carolina Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors, 1999 N.C. AG LEXIS 25 (11/16/99).